Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 5. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 46.14.500.
Air pollution from outer continental shelf activities.

The department shall seek delegation of authority from the federal administrator to implement and enforce the terms and provisions of 42 U.S.C. 7627 (Clean Air Act, sec. 328) for the Pacific and Arctic Ocean areas offshore of the state. The department may adopt regulations that are necessary to acquire this delegated authority.

In adopting regulations under this section, the department shall ensure that stationary sources located within 25 miles of the seaward boundary of the state are subject to the same air quality control requirements that would be applicable if the stationary source were located in the corresponding onshore area. For purposes of this subsection, stationary sources located within 25 miles of the seaward boundary of the state include a vessel servicing or associated with the stationary source while at the stationary source or en route to or from the stationary source and within 25 miles of the stationary source.

In this section, “corresponding onshore area” means, with respect to a stationary source located within 25 miles of the seaward boundary of the state, the onshore attainment or nonattainment area that is closest to the stationary source, unless the commissioner determines that another area with more stringent requirements relating to control and abatement of air pollution may reasonably be expected to be affected by emissions from the offshore stationary source; this determination shall be based on the potential for air pollutants from the stationary source to reach the other onshore area and the potential of the air pollutants to affect the efforts of the other onshore area to attain or maintain a federal ambient air quality standard set under 42 U.S.C. 7470 — 7492 (Clean Air Act, secs. 160 — 169b) or a state equivalent.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am §§ 42, 43 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 27 ch 58 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 10, 2010, in (c), substituted “42 U.S.C. 7470 — 7492 (Clean Air Act, secs. 160 — 169b)” for “42 U.S.C. 7470 — 7492 (Title I, Part C, Clean Air Act)”.

Sec. 46.14.510.
Motor vehicle pollution.

When the department determines that the state of knowledge and technology may allow or make appropriate the control of emissions from motor vehicles to further air quality control, the department may provide, by regulation, for the control of the emissions from motor vehicles. The regulations may prescribe requirements for the installation and use of equipment designed to reduce or eliminate emissions and for the proper maintenance of this equipment.

Unless otherwise exempted by law, a person shall maintain in operating condition any element of the air pollution control system or mechanism of a motor vehicle that the department, by regulation, requires to be maintained in or on the motor vehicle.

The department shall consult with the Department of Administration regarding implementation of the motor vehicle pollution control program. The Department of Administration shall cooperate with the department in implementing the program. As a part of a motor vehicle pollution control program, the department or a municipality that enforces a motor vehicle pollution control program may determine if a vehicle is properly registered as required by law.

If the department adopts regulations requiring the maintenance of air pollution control systems or mechanisms in motor vehicles to control emissions from the vehicle, a motor vehicle subject to those regulations may not be issued a certificate of inspection unless the required air pollution control system or mechanism has been inspected in accordance with the standards, testing techniques, and instructions furnished by the department and the motor vehicle has been found to meet those standards. A valid certificate of inspection for the emission control system, if required by the department, must be presented to the Department of Administration before that department may register a motor vehicle.

If the department adopts regulations requiring emissions inspection for a motor vehicle, the department may not require the vehicle be inspected more than once every two years.

A person who fails to display an emissions inspection decal as required by law is guilty of a violation and, upon conviction, shall be fined an amount not to exceed $500. It is the intent of the legislature that money collected under this subsection be appropriated to control pollution from motor vehicle emissions.

In addition to the emission control inspection program fee imposed under AS

28.10.423

, the department or a municipality may impose a fee upon a vehicle required to be inspected under a motor vehicle emission control program established under this chapter, but the fee may not exceed the actual costs of the department or the municipality in administering

the motor vehicle emission control inspection program; and

the related ambient air monitoring program.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 5 ch 56 SLA 1995; am § 17 ch 44 SLA 1996; am E.O. No. 99 §§ 74, 75 (1997); am §§ 6 — 8 ch 97 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For fuel requirements for motor vehicles, see 18 AAC 53.

For emissions inspection and maintenance requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 1.

For certification requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 4.

For certified station requirements, see 18 AAC 52, art. 5.

For oxygenated gasoline requirements, see 18 AAC 53, art. 1.

Sec. 46.14.515.
Inspection.

An officer or employee of the department designated by the commissioner or an inspector authorized by the commissioner and certified under regulations adopted under AS

46.14.140(a)(14)

may, upon presentation of credentials and at reasonable times with the consent of the owner or operator, enter upon or through any premises of a stationary source regulated under this chapter to

inspect and copy any records required to be maintained;

inspect any emissions unit, monitoring equipment, or method required to be used; or

sample any emissions that the owner and operator of the stationary source is required to sample.

During an inspection under this section, the inspector shall comply with applicable health and safety standards.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 44 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 78 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For major stationary source permits, see 18 AAC 50, art. 3.

For oxygenated gasoline requirements, see 18 AAC 53, art. 1.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Alaska’s inspection and entry authority meets the requirements of federal law and regulations, and imposes no greater restrictions on the state’s inspection authority than exist under federal law.
Although the Alaska Constitution contains a broader guarantee against unreasonable search and seizure than the U.S. Constitution, facilities with an operating permit issued under AS 46.14 are closely regulated with little reasonable expectation of privacy, and Alaska’s provisions requiring owners and operators of these facilities to consent to entry and inspection are permissible under the Alaska Constitution.
Exceptions to the warrant requirement that are available under federal law are also available under state law, and the restrictions on the state’s inspection authority are no greater than under federal law.
May 18, 1998 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 46.14.520.
Confidentiality of trade secrets.

Records, reports, and information, and parts of records, reports, and information, other than emission data, in the department’s possession or control are considered confidential records and shall be kept confidential and in separate files if the owner and operator have certified under oath to the department or authorized local program that

public disclosure would tend to affect adversely the owner’s and operator’s competitive position; and

the records, reports, or information, or parts of the records, reports, or information, would divulge production figures, sales figures, processes, production techniques, or financial data of the owner and operator that are entitled to protection as trade secrets under AS

45.50.910

—

45.50.945

(Alaska Uniform Trade Secrets Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Sec. 46.14.525.
Public records.

Except as provided in AS

46.14.520

, permits, permit applications, emissions and monitoring reports, compliance reports, certifications, and monitoring, reporting, and quality assurance plans in the department’s possession or control are available to the public for inspection and copying.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Sec. 46.14.530.
State and federal aid.

A municipality or local air quality district with a local air quality control program may apply for, receive, administer, and spend state aid for the control of air emissions or the development and administration of the program if an application is first submitted to and approved by the department. Subject to available money appropriated by the legislature for the purpose of this section, the department may approve an application if it is consistent with the terms and conditions of the applicable cooperative agreement and meets the requirements of this chapter.

A municipality or local air quality district with a local air quality control program may apply for, receive, administer, and spend federal aid for the control of air emissions or the development and administration of the program.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993)

Sec. 46.14.535.
Grants. [Repealed, § 4 ch 20 SLA 2009.]

Sec. 46.14.540.
Authority of department in cases of emergency.

When the commissioner finds that an act of God, act of war, act of terrorism, or similar catastrophe necessitates emergency use of an unpermitted emissions unit or emergency use of a permitted emissions unit in a manner not authorized by the permit, the commissioner may waive procedural requirements of this chapter and issue an order to authorize emergency use of the emissions unit. When acting under this section, the commissioner shall impose conditions necessary to protect life, human health, welfare, property, and the environment and may impose other conditions the commissioner finds necessary and appropriate.

An authorization issued under this section automatically terminates within a reasonable time after abatement of the emergency, subject to a maximum of 30 days from the date of issuance. However, the commissioner may reissue an authorization, if warranted, that may remain in effect for up to another 30 days. An authorization may be reissued more than once.

A person acting under an order issued under (a) of this section is considered to be acting in compliance with the operating permit program established in this chapter.

The commissioner may delegate the commissioner’s authority under this section to deputy commissioners and division directors in the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 45 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 79 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Sec. 46.14.550.
Responsibilities of owner and operator; agent for service.

Notwithstanding use of the conjunctive or disjunctive in a provision of this chapter, before issuance of a permit under this chapter both the owner and operator of a stationary source are responsible for compliance with this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter. If the owner and operator of the stationary source are separate persons, only one person is required to discharge a specific responsibility. After issuance of a permit under this chapter, only the permittee is responsible for permitted operations. The permittee shall have a designated agent for service of process in the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 46 ch 46 SLA 2003)

Sec. 46.14.560.
Unavoidable malfunctions and emergencies.

Excess emissions caused by an unavoidable emergency, a malfunction, or nonroutine repairs of an emissions unit including pollution control equipment or process equipment constitute an affirmative defense, when asserted under regulations adopted under AS

46.14.140

, to an action brought for noncompliance with a technology-based emission standard. This section does not limit the department’s power to enjoin the emission or require corrective action. This provision is in addition to any emergency or upset provision contained in an applicable requirement.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 47 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 80 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.